apertium-hin.hin.dix
	 <pardef n="द/े__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाला</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाले</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाली</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनेवाली</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेना</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेनी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेने</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेता</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेते</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेती</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेती</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेकर</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>ेके</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िया</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="सहयोग दे"><i>सहयोग<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मान ले"><i>मान<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निशाना ले"><i>निशाना<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढ़ावा दे"><i>बढ़ावा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहमति दे"><i>सहमति<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="इजाज़त दे"><i>इजाज़त<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बाँट दे"><i>बाँट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मिला ले"><i>मिला<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फेर ले"><i>फेर<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निकाल दे"><i>निकाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जन्म दे"><i>जन्म<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जता दे"><i>जता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उड़ा दे"><i>उड़ा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढक दे"><i>ढक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढ़ा दे"><i>बढ़ा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उधार ले"><i>उधार<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="श्वास ले"><i>श्वास<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शिक्षा दे"><i>शिक्षा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="डाल दे"><i>डाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गाड़ दे"><i>गाड़<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निर्णय दे"><i>निर्णय<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तसल्ली दे"><i>तसल्ली<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उलट दे"><i>उलट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भूमिका दे"><i>भूमिका<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पकड़ ले"><i>पकड़<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चेतावनी दे"><i>चेतावनी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जेम्मेदारी दे"><i>जेम्मेदारी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढावा दे"><i>बढावा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फेंक दे"><i>फेंक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मान्यता दे"><i>मान्यता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छीन ले"><i>छीन<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रंग दे"><i>रंग<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आदेश दे"><i>आदेश<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हुक्म दे"><i>हुक्म<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="साथ दे"><i>साथ<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गड़बड़ा दे"><i>गड़बड़ा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दबा दे"><i>दबा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="योगदान दे"><i>योगदान<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खरिद ले"><i>खरिद<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सलाह दे"><i>सलाह<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ढक ले"><i>ढक<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जमा दे"><i>जमा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुनौती दे"><i>चुनौती<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोख़ा दे"><i>धोख़ा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुनौती दे"><i>चुनौती<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखा दे"><i>धोखा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दिखाई दे"><i>दिखाई<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दंड दे"><i>दंड<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="टाल दे"><i>टाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भाग दे"><i>भाग<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखा दे"><i>धोखा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="झपकी ले"><i>झपकी<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छोड दे"><i>छोड<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भुला दे"><i>भुला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शिक्षा दे"><i>शिक्षा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="महत्त्व दे"><i>महत्त्व<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढावा दे"><i>बढावा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आन्ंअद ले"><i>आन्ंअद<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="काट दे"><i>काट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शिक्षा दे"><i>शिक्षा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ब्योरा दे"><i>ब्योरा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहायता दे"><i>सहायता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शोभा दे"><i>शोभा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर दे"><i>भर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चकरा दे"><i>चकरा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भुला दे"><i>भुला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखा दे"><i>धोखा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुनौती दे"><i>चुनौती<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बदला ले"><i>बदला<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उपहार दे"><i>उपहार<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="व्याख्या दे"><i>व्याख्या<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढ़ावा दे"><i>बढ़ावा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दायित्व ले"><i>दायित्व<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ध्यान दे"><i>ध्यान<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पकड़ ले"><i>पकड़<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सटा ले"><i>सटा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सूचकांक दे"><i>सूचकांक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आदेश दे"><i>आदेश<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आँतरिकता दे"><i>आँतरिकता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गाली दे"><i>गाली<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शाथ दे"><i>शाथ<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ब्यौरा दे"><i>ब्यौरा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रट ले"><i>रट<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ताला दे"><i>ताला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उपदेश दे"><i>उपदेश<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ध्यान दे"><i>ध्यान<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="उलट दे"><i>उलट<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पास दे"><i>पास<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अनुमति दे"><i>अनुमति<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिट्र ले"><i>चिट्र<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ऊर्जा दे"><i>ऊर्जा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढा दे"><i>बढा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कुचल दे"><i>कुचल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मान्यता दे"><i>मान्यता<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फेंक दे"><i>फेंक<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हाजिरी दे"><i>हाजिरी<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सहारा दे"><i>सहारा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दिखाई दे"><i>दिखाई<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखा दे"><i>धोखा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="देख ले"><i>देख<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हिला दे"><i>हिला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आश्रय दे"><i>आश्रय<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="काम दे"><i>काम<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हटा ले"><i>हटा<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लूट ले"><i>लूट<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="साँस ले"><i>साँस<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खींच ले"><i>खींच<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धकेल दे"><i>धकेल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखा दे"><i>धोखा<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भुला दे"><i>भुला<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="राय दे"><i>राय<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निकाल ले"><i>निकाल<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सम्मन दे"><i>सम्मन<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सिकोड़ ले"><i>सिकोड़<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खर्राटे ले"><i>खर्राटे<b/>ल</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जोर दे"><i>जोर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रौंद दे"><i>रौंद<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर दे"><i>भर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भाषण दे"><i>भाषण<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निकाल दे"><i>निकाल<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज़ोर दे"><i>ज़ोर<b/>द</i><par n="द/े__vblex_tv"/></e>
